Massachusetts, session 194th, H2808.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3 of chapter 32 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 2
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in line 297, after the word "Authority;" the
following: “any campus police officer employed at a Massachusetts state college, university,
community college and the University of Massachusetts”
of 1